District of Columbia statutes.
47-1818.04

Certification.

(a)

Within 180 days of the effective date of this subchapter, the Mayor shall certify that the Qualified Social E-Commerce Company and the District have executed a BAS agreement.

(b)

The Mayor shall certify to the Office of Tax and Revenue the identity of each Qualified Social E-Commerce Company for which eligibility for an abatement pursuant to this subchapter has been verified by the Mayor and shall provide a description of the qualified real property that is to receive an abatement and the date on which the abatement shall commence.

Oct. 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-174, § 2, 59 DCR 8712
This section is referenced in § 47-1818.02, § 47-1818.03, and § 47-1818.05.